Oklahoma, session 2026, SB610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 17 O.S. 2021, Section 286, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 286. A. 1. The portion of costs incurred by an


electric utility, which is subject to rate regulation by the


Corporation Commission, for transmission upgrades approved by a


regional transmission organization to which the utility is a member


and resulting from an order of a federal regulatory authority having


legal jurisdiction over interstate regulation of transmission rates,


shall be presumed recoverable by the utility. The presumption


established in this paragraph may be rebutted by evidence that the


costs so incurred by the utility for the transmission upgrades


exceed the scope of the project authorized by the regional

Req. No. 663 Page 1


transmission organization or order issued by the federal regulatory


authority having jurisdiction over interstate regulation of


transmission rates. The Commission shall transmit rules to


implement the requirements of this subsection to the Legislature on


or before April 1, 2006. The rules may authorize an electric


utility to periodically adjust its rates to recover all or a portion


of the costs so incurred by the utility for the transmission


upgrades.


2. Reasonable costs incurred by an electric utility for


transmission upgrades:


a. needed to develop wind generation in this state,


b. approved by the Southwest Power Pool, and


c. placed into service before December 31, 2013,


shall be presumed recoverable through a periodic adjustment in the


rates of the utility, provided that the presumption of the recovery


of such costs or the recovery of such costs through a periodic


adjustment in rates may be rebutted by evidence presented to the


Commission. The determination of whether the costs shall be


recovered and whether the costs shall be recovered through a


periodic adjustment of rates shall be made by the Commission


following proper notice and hearing in a cause to be filed by the


electric utility in which it files such information as the


Commission may require.



Req. No. 663 Page 2


B. An electric utility subject to rate regulation by the


Corporation Commission may file an application seeking Commission


authorization of a plan by the utility to make capital expenditures


for equipment or facilities necessary to comply with the federal


Clean Air Act (CAA), the Clean Water Act (CWA), the Comprehensive


Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA),


the Emergency Planning & Community Right-to-Know Act (EPCRA), the


Endangered Species Act (ESA), the National Environmental Policy Act


(NEPA), the Occupational Safety and Health Act (OSHA), the Oil


Pollution Act (OPA), the Pollution Prevention Act (PPA), the


Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA), the Safe Drinking


Water Act (SDWA), the Toxic Substances Control Act (TSCA), all as


amended, and, as the Commission may deem appropriate, federal,


state, local or tribal environmental requirements which apply to


generation facilities. If approved by the Commission, after notice


and hearing, the equipment or facilities specified in the approved


utility plan are conclusively presumed used and useful. The utility


may elect to periodically adjust its rates to recover the costs of


the expenditures. The utility shall file a request for a review of


its rates pursuant to Section 152 of this title no more than twenty-


four (24) months after the utility begins recovering the costs


through a periodic rate adjustment mechanism and no more than


twenty-four (24) months after the utility begins recovering the


costs through any subsequent periodic rate adjustment mechanism.

Req. No. 663 Page 3


Provided further, that a periodic rate adjustment or adjustments are


not intended to prevent a utility from seeking cost recovery of


capital expenditures as otherwise may be authorized by the


Commission. However, the reasonableness of the costs to be


recovered by the utility shall be subject to Commission review and


approval. The Commission shall promulgate rules to implement the


provisions of this subsection, such rules to be transmitted to the


Legislature on or before April 1, 2007.


C. 1. An electric utility subject to rate regulation by the


Corporation Commission may elect to file an application seeking


approval by the Commission to construct a new electric generating


facility, to purchase an existing electric generation facility or


enter into a long-term contract for purchased power and capacity


and/or energy, subject to the provisions of this subsection. If,


and to the extent that, the Commission determines there is a need


for construction or purchase of the electric generating facility or


long-term purchase power contract, the generating facility or


contract shall be considered used and useful and its costs shall be


subject to cost recovery rules promulgated by the Commission. The


Commission shall enter an order on an application filed pursuant to


this subsection within two hundred forty (240) days of the filing of


the application, following notice and hearing and after


consideration of reasonable alternatives.



Req. No. 663 Page 4


2. Following receipt of an application filed pursuant to this


subsection, the Corporation Commission staff may file a request to


assess the specific costs, to be paid by the electric utility and


which shall be deemed to be recoverable, for the costs associated


with conducting the analysis or investigation of the application


including, but not limited to, the cost of acquiring expert


witnesses, consultants, and analytical services. The request shall


be filed at and heard by the Corporation Commissioners in the docket


opened by the electric utility pursuant to this subsection. After


notice and hearing, the Commission shall decide the request.


3. Additionally, following receipt of an application filed


pursuant to this subsection, the Office of the Attorney General may


file a request with the Corporation Commission for the assessment of


specific costs, to be paid by the electric utility and which shall


be deemed to be recoverable, associated with the performance of the


Attorney General’s duties as provided by law. Those costs may


include, but are not limited to, the cost of acquiring expert


witnesses, consultants and analytical services. The request shall


be filed at and heard by the Corporation Commissioners in the docket


opened by the electric utility pursuant to this subsection. After


notice and hearing, the Commission shall decide the request.


4. The Commission shall promulgate rules to implement the


provisions of this subsection. The rules shall be transmitted to


the Legislature on or before April 1, 2006. In promulgating rules

Req. No. 663 Page 5


to implement the provisions of this subsection, the Commission shall


consider, among other things, rules which would:


a. permit contemporaneous utility recovery from its


customers, the amount necessary to cover the


Corporation Commission staff and Attorney General


assessments as authorized by this subsection,


b. establish how the cost of facilities approved pursuant


to this subsection shall be timely reviewed, approved,


and recovered or disapproved, and


c. establish the information which an electric utility


must provide when filing an application pursuant to


this subsection, including information regarding the


use or nonuse of grid enhancement technology to


mitigate potential energy costs which may have caused


the application to be filed.


5. The Commission shall also consider rules which may permit an


electric utility to begin to recover return on or return of


Construction-Work-In-Progress expenses prior to commercial operation


of a newly constructed electric generation facility subject to the


provisions of this subsection.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-663 RD 1/19/2025 5:40:01 AM



Req. No. 663 Page 6